Hawaii statutes.
§171-23 Land patents and deeds, issued
when. Except as otherwise provided, a land patent or a deed shall issue
under the seal of the department of land and natural resources to the purchaser
in fee simple of any public land or other land disposable by the board of land
and natural resources or to any holder of an award from the board [of]
commissioners to quiet titles upon payment of the commutation, if any, required
under sections 172-1 to 172-6 and upon presentation of satisfactory proof by
the claimant to the lands covered by the award of sufficient right, title, and
interest to the awarded land. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-23; HRS
§171-23]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next